Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 18. Health

Executive Order No. 18-1
(No. 35-79) [State Center for Health Statistics.

WHEREAS, the planning and development of an improved health care delivery system in Vermont requires data on health status and the availability of health manpower, facilities, and other health resources; and

WHEREAS, the problems of inadequate information, lack of comparability, and duplication of data collection efforts in these areas have been addressed by the Health Services Research, Health Statistics, and Medical Libraries Act of 1974 (PL 93—353), the
National Health Planning and Resources Development Act of 1974 (PS 93—641), the Health Professionals Educational Assistance Act of 1976 (PL 94—484) and the Health Services Research, Health Statistics, and Health Care Technology Act
of 1978 (PL 95—623); and

WHEREAS, the Health Services Research, Health Statistics and Health Care Technology Act of 1978 establishes the Cooperative Health Statistics System and requires that states participating in the system designate a state agent to administer statistical
activities under the system; and

WHEREAS, the Vermont Department of Health, through its Division of Public Health Statistics, is both the primary and coordinating agency for Cooperative Health Statistics System activities within Vermont;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, in order to carry into effect the action referred to above, do hereby designate the Vermont Department of Health as the Official State Center for Health Statistics
in Vermont.

Dated July 18, 1979.

Executive Order No. 18-2
(No. 42-79) [State Employee Medical Benefit Plan Special Fund.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont is obligated to provide a certain program of medical care benefits to its eligible employees, and

WHEREAS, the state wishes to self-fund this program to achieve greater economic benefits for itself and its employees, and

WHEREAS, the state has contracted with a medical care benefit plan administrating company to administer the plan on behalf of the state, effective January 1, 1980, and

WHEREAS, to facilitate the administration of such health benefit plan, the state desires to establish a special fund account with the State Treasury,

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby order and direct that:

A special fund entitled “State Employee Medical Benefit Plan Special Fund” be established and a depository designated by the State Treasurer; and

The health insurance premium equivalents paid both by the state and its employees covering the period starting January 1, 1980 be deposited to this Special Fund as soon as practical after each pay period, and

Any interest or other earnings of the Special Fund shall be deposited into the Special Fund, and

Withdrawals from the Special Fund shall be made only for the purpose of paying medical benefits in accordance with the provisions of the state employees medical benefit plan and for paying certain administrative costs associated with the medical benefit
plan which are determined appropriate by the Secretary of Administration.

FURTHER, BE IT ORDERED:

That the operation of this Special Fund be subject to the same legal compliance responsibilities and accountabilities as other state accounts under the direction of the State Treasurer, and

That appropriate and timely reports of Special Fund activity, including deposits, earnings, and withdrawals, be made by the Commissioner of Finance and the State Treasurer to the Secretary of Administration who shall have overall responsibility for the
operation of the medical benefit plan and this Special Fund.

Dated November 30, 1979.

Executive Order No. 18-3
(No. 48-80) [State Employee Dental Assistance Plan.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont is obligated to provide a certain program of dental care benefits to its eligible employees, and

WHEREAS, the State has contracted with a licensed insurance company to provide these dental benefits beginning July 6, 1980, and

WHEREAS, the State wishes to achieve economic benefits for itself by choosing a minimum premium type funding, and

WHEREAS, such minimum premium insured plan requires certain special banking arrangements,

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the authority vested in me as Governor, do hereby order and direct that:

A special fund entitled “State of Vermont Employee Dental Assistance Plan” be established and a depository designated by the State Treasurer; and

The portion of the total plan cost designated by the insurance company be deposited to this special fund at the required intervals as necessary reserves for claims; and

A separate account be established by the Treasurer in a bank designated by the insurance company to facilitate the operation of the claim payment system established by the insurer.

FURTHER, BE IT ORDERED:

That the operations of these Special Fund accounts be subject to the same legal compliance responsibilities and accountabilities as other state accounts under the direction of the State Treasurer, and

That appropriate and timely reports of account activity, including deposits, earnings and withdrawals, be made by the Commissioner of Finance and the State Treasurer to the Secretary of Administration who shall have overall responsibility for the operation
of the dental assistance plan and this Special Fund.

Dated May 7, 1980.

Executive Order No. 18-4
(No. 73A-89) [Compensation of Members of Vermont Mental Health Planning Council.

Rescinded by Executive Order 6-99 (codified as Executive Order No. 18-12), dated June 11, 1999.

Executive Order No. 18-5
(No. 14-91) [Rabies Task Force.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 18-6
(No. 01-92) [Transfer of Governor’s Council on Physical Fitness and Sports from Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to Department of Health.

WHEREAS, The Governor’s Council on Physical Fitness and Sports was created through Executive Order by Governor Snelling in 1981 and given legislative authority by Act 173 in 1985; and

WHEREAS, the Council has been attached since its beginning to the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation for administrative purposes; and

WHEREAS, there has been a significant growth of public interest in health and fitness since the Council began; and

WHEREAS, the Council has a number of programs that are helping to further promote fitness and health among Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, the Department of Health is in a better position to provide the support that the Council needs to further its goals;

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, M.D., by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby order as follows:

The Governor’s Council on Physical Fitness and Sports is transferred from the Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation to the Department of Health for administrative purposes.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated January 14, 1992.

Executive Order No. 18-7
(No. 03-93) [Drug Utilization Review Board.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order 08-10 (codified as Executive Order No. 33-20), dated September 8, 2010.

Executive Order No. 18-8
(No. 03-94) [Drug Policy Cabinet.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 3-46 (codified as Executive Order 06-05), dated September 13, 2005.

Executive Order No. 18-9
(No. 07-94) [Pilot Program to Eliminate Lead-Based Paint Hazards in Housing.

WHEREAS, the State of Vermont has received a grant of $2,534,293 from the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (“HUD”) to eliminate lead-based paint hazards in housing which is, or will be, occupied by children under the age of six (the “HUD
Grant”); and

WHEREAS, the Vermont Housing and Conservation Board (“Board”) is a public instrumentality of the State of Vermont established to create affordable housing and preserve agricultural land, historic properties, important natural areas and recreational lands;
and

WHEREAS, the Board, in active partnership with the Department of Housing and Community Affairs (“DHCA”), the Department of Health (“DOH”) and the Vermont Housing Finance Agency (“VHFA”), has implemented a policy which requires grantees to develop housing
which is lead safe for children under six; and

WHEREAS, the HUD Grant will allow Vermont to start a pilot program to provide grants and loans to property owners to eliminate lead-based paint hazards in approximately 500 rental housing units and five owner-occupied single-family homes throughout the
state; and

WHEREAS, effective and timely implementation of the HUD Grant will be a major step toward guaranteeing all Vermont children a lead-safe home and complementing the work already begun by the Board, DHCA, VHFA, DOH Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Program,
the Abatement Coordination Team and the Lead Paint Hazard Commission.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby order the following actions:

The Vermont Housing and Conservation Board (hereinafter the “Board”) is authorized to sign a Grant Agreement with the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (“HUD”) for the purpose of receiving HUD funds under the Lead-Based Paint Hazard Reduction
Grant Program (the “HUD Grant”). The Board is authorized to use the HUD Grant to establish and administer a Vermont program to eliminate lead-based paint hazards in housing which is, or will be, occupied by children under age six.

The Board shall work closely with DHCA, the Department of Health Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Program and the Abatement Coordination Team to develop and manage a successful Pilot Program for Vermont and, as part of its Annual Report to the General
Assembly, shall include a description of activities supported by the HUD Grant.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated April 24, 1994.

Executive Order No. 18-10
(No. 09-96) [Governor’s Health Care Financing Review Panel.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 1, 1997.

Executive Order No. 18-11
(No. 13-98) [Commission on Public Health Care Values and Priorities.

Superseded by Executive Order No. 02-01, effective January 23, 2001.

Executive Order No. 18-12
(No. 06-99) [State Program Standing Committee.

WHEREAS, the Department of Developmental and Mental Health Services (DDMHS) promulgated regulations that require DDMHS to establish a State Program Standing Committee for each population receiving funding from DDMHS; and

WHEREAS, each State Program Standing Committee has specific responsibilities for monitoring and evaluating the service system as well as for planning and decision-making with regard to DDMHS policy; and

WHEREAS, these Standing Committees share many of the responsibilities of the current seven-member Board of Mental Health; and

WHEREAS, on November 7, 1998, the Board of Mental Health approved a motion to advise the Commissioner of Developmental and Mental Health Services to disband the Board of Mental Health.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, M.D., by the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, to hereby rescind Executive Order #73A-89, dated March 13, 1989.

The State Program Standing Committees will assume the functions of the Planning Council referred to in Executive Order #73A-89. Current members of the Board of Mental Health will be offered slots on the new State Program Standing Committees.

Dated June 11, 1999.

Executive Order No. 18-13
(No. 02-01) [Commission on Public Health Care Values and Priorities.

Expired by its own terms, effective July 1, 2002.

Executive Order No. 18-14
(No. 04-01) [Bipartisan Commission on Health Care Availability and Affordability.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2002.

Executive Order No. 18-15
(No. 10-02) [Reestablishment of the Commission on Public Health Care Values and Priorities.

Expired by its own terms, effective January 1, 2003.

Executive Order No. 18-16
(No. 01-06) [Hunger Task Force.

Expired by its own terms, effective November 15, 2009.

Executive Order No. 18-17
(No. 08-09) [Governor’s Health Care Cabinet.

Superseded and replaced by Executive Order No. 06-10 (codified as Executive Order No. 18-19), dated July 30, 2010.

Executive Order No. 18-18
(No. 11-09) [Interagency Council on Hunger.

WHEREAS, the Governor’s Hunger Task Force confirms that hunger is a fact of life for many Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, the current economic situation has increased the ranks of Vermonters who cannot purchase sufficient food to avoid hunger and its consequences; and

WHEREAS, the consequences of inadequate access to nutritious foods and a healthful diet have been shown to contribute to decreased ability to perform in school or on the job and to chronic health problems throughout life, such as diabetes, cardiovascular
disease, and obesity; and

WHEREAS, solving the problem of hunger in Vermont will require several agencies, departments and community agencies to work closely together.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, James H. Douglas, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby establish an Interagency Council on Hunger. The Council shall be advisory to the Governor and shall have the following functions and
duties:

to monitor hunger in Vermont and analyze factors contributing to its causes;

to the extent to which public and private sector programs and services are addressing the problem of hunger in Vermont; and

to recommend, coordinate, and support actions that can be taken, sustained or expanded by agencies and individuals in the public and private sectors to reduce hunger in Vermont.

The Council shall consist of no more than ten members and shall be composed as follows:

• The Secretary of the Agency of Human services, or his/her designee, who shall serve as Chair;

• The commissioner of Education, or his/her designee;

• The Commissioner of the Department of Children and Families, or his/her designee;

• The Secretary of the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets, or his/her designee;

• One representative from the ecumenical sector appointed by the Governor to a three year term;

• One representative from a Community Action Agency appointed by the Governor to a three year term; and

• Four individuals appointed by the Governor to three year terms who represent private agencies and programs that provide services to low-income Vermonters, as follows: one shall be a statewide organization with an anti-hunger focus; one shall be an organization
that provides services to a vulnerable population such as elders, disabled or homeless persons; and two shall be organizations that work directly with and represent people who are low income and likely to be affected by hunger.

The Chair may call upon other persons or organizations as needed to assist the Council in its endeavors. The Council may establish sub-committees for the effective discharge of its responsibilities.

The Agency of Human Services shall provide administrative and staff support to the Council.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall expire on November 30, 2015, unless extended.

Dated November 12, 2009.

Executive Order No. 18-19
(No. 06-10) [Governor’s Health Care Cabinet.

Expired by its own terms, effective June 30, 2011.

Executive Order No. 18-20
(No. 10-11) [Blue Ribbon Commission on Nursing.

Expired by its own terms, effective September 30, 2012.

Executive Order No. 18-21
(No. 12-11) [Designation of VSH at Springfield, Vermont.

Revoked and rescinded by Executive Order No. 01-15 (codified as Executive Order 3-66), dated February 13, 2015.

Executive Order No. 18-22
(No. 07-13) [Governor’s Health Care Workforce Work Group.

WHEREAS, successful transformation of Vermont’s health care system is essential to improve the access to care for, and the quality of care provided to, Vermonters; and

WHEREAS, to achieve this transformation depends on having a health care workforce with the right skills in the right place at the right time; and

WHEREAS, a properly equipped health care workforce will require health reform initiatives that cut across traditional lines of state agency and department responsibility and will require maximum involvement of the community of educational and health professional
stakeholders.

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Peter Shumlin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby establish the Governor’s Health Care Workforce Work Group as set forth below.

Composition, Appointments, Process.

The Secretary of Administration shall select and appoint the members of the Workforce Work Group, as called for in the Health Care Workforce Strategic Plan, dated January 15, 2013, and adopted by the Green Mountain Care Board. The Work Group shall include
state government interagency representation as well as representation from health care employers, clinicians, membership organizations, secondary and higher education, and other relevant interest groups.

Each member of the Work Group shall serve a three-year term and may be reappointed to subsequent terms by the Secretary.

The Work Group shall have two co-chairs, one selected by the Secretary of Administration and one elected by the members of the Work Group from among its members. The Work Group shall designate the term of each chair.

The Work Group shall meet at the call of the co-chairs.

Administrative and staff support shall be provided by the Agency of Administration.

Charge.

The Work Group shall be advisory to the Governor and the Secretary of Administration and shall:

A.
provide statewide direction and planning for health workforce initiatives and activities;

B.
monitor health workforce trends and needs;

C.
develop strategic health workforce objectives and activities that could be pursued by state government and stakeholders;

D.
advise the Secretary of Administration and relevant state agencies on the development of short and long term workforce supply, demand, and performance measures in order to provide the information needed for strategic
workforce development and investment;

E.
research and recommend to the Governor and the Secretary public and private opportunities for funding health workforce initiatives;

F.
serve as the workforce advisory group for the State Innovation Model grant; and

G.
report at least annually to the Governor and the Secretary on progress in developing a health workforce and provide workforce recommendations to ensure health care reform success.

Effective Date.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until further order by the Governor.

Dated August 1, 2013

Executive Order No. 18-23
(No. 05-21) [Decriminalized Buprenorphine Task Force.

WHEREAS, since taking office, the Governor has demonstrated commitment to providing access to opiate addiction treatment for individuals in need; and

WHEREAS, through hard work and partnership among state, local and community partners, the state can now quickly meet the demand for opiate addiction treatment services in all 14 counties; and

WHEREAS, Vermont is nationally recognized for its collaborative “hub and spoke” system of treatment for opiate addiction; and

WHEREAS, the Governor remains committed to building upon the progress of previous administrations in this area by re-focusing efforts in the areas of education and prevention, treatment, recovery and enforcement; and

WHEREAS, State and local law enforcement and the courts are working with the health system to get individuals treatment and prosecute the large dealers; and

WHEREAS, unfortunately, with the COVID-19 pandemic and the isolation and the increased financial and other stressors faced by Vermonters, Vermont saw a dramatic spike in fatal and non-fatal opioid overdoses; and

WHEREAS, in an effort to do all we can to address increased numbers of opioid overdose fatalities, the Legislature passed, and the Governor signed into law H. 225, An act relating to possession of a therapeutic dosage of buprenorphine, which decriminalizes
the possession of 224 milligrams or less of buprenorphine on the theory that greater street availability will result in fewer opioid-related deaths and a greater likelihood those with substance misuse disorder will seek treatment;
and

WHEREAS, although the data on whether decriminalizing buprenorphine is effective in reducing opiate overdoses is unproven, we know substance use disorder is a chronic illness and we continue to see the devastating impact of opioid addiction; and

WHEREAS, the Legislature has included an endpoint for H. 225, which will sunset on July 1, 2023, providing experts the opportunity to assess the effectiveness of this initiative.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Philip B. Scott, by the authority vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby issue the following directive to the Chief Prevention Officer to coordinate with interested agencies and parties to gather
data and assess the impact of legislation to decriminalize the possession of 224 milligrams or less of buprenorphine, as follows:

A.
The Chief Prevention Office shall have the authority to convene a Buprenorphine Task Force made up of representatives from the Departments of the Agency of Human Services and the Department of Public Safety to establish
metrics and gather baseline data as necessary to assess the impact of the decriminalization of buprenorphine on Vermonters and Vermont communities.

B.
The Chief Prevention Officer shall call the first meeting of the Task Force prior to June 30, 2021.

C.
The Chief Prevention Officer and the Task Force shall:

Develop metrics to assess impacts of expanded access to buprenorphine in the community and advise the Governor on the data to be collected and periodically reported to the Governor.

Collaborate with relevant Executive Branch agencies, departments, boards, and commissions, including the Chief Performance Officer and the Executive Director of Racial Equity as well as community treatment providers and local law enforcement to gather
relevant data and records necessary to carry out the purposes of this Executive Order.

Manage and oversee the collection of data to determine the nature and scope of the impact of the buprenorphine decriminalization policy.

No later than January 1, 2023 make recommendations to the Governor regarding the continuation of, and any modifications needed to the policy and state programming, as applicable.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing and shall continue in full force and effect until further order by the Governor or June 30, 2023, whichever is earlier.

Dated June 1, 2021